Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,111
Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act, how cited.

Sections 79-8,111 to 79-8,118 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 43.
January 1, 2028